apertium-sat.sat.dix
<pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


   <pardef n="ABC__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="__abbr">
<!-- Rupee -->
      <e>     <p><l>रु</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>रु.</l><r>रु.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
<!-- ᱱᱚᱢᱵᱚᱨ -->	  
	  <e>     <p><l>ᱱᱚ</l><r>ᱱᱚ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>     <p><l>ᱱᱚ.</l><r>ᱱᱚ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
<!-- ᱫᱟᱠᱛᱚᱨ -->	  
	  <e>     <p><l>ᱰᱨ</l><r>ᱰᱨ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>     <p><l>ᱰᱨ.</l><r>ᱰᱨ.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>	  
	  
</pardef>
		
<pardef n="emails">
  <e>       <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="urls">
  <e>       <!--      <re>(www.|http://|https://|ftp://)[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-./]+[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9/]</re> --><re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="ip">
  <e>       <re>(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9])(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Affixation -->

<!-- Affixation -Suffix -->

<!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

<pardef n="ᱢᱤᱫ__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱢᱤᱫᱴᱟᱹᱝ__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>ᱥᱟᱭ</l><r><b/>ᱥᱟᱭ<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>ᱦᱟᱡᱟᱨ</l><r><b/>ᱦᱟᱡᱟᱨ<s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱢᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱵᱟᱨᱜᱮᱞ__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ᱢᱤᱫ</l>      <r>-ᱢᱤᱫ</r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ᱵᱟᱨ</l>      <r>-two</r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ᱯᱮ</l>    <r>-ᱯᱮ</r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ᱯᱩᱱ</l>     <r>-ᱯᱩᱱ</r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ᱢᱚᱸᱬᱮ</l>     <r>-ᱢᱚᱸᱬᱮ</r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭ</l>      <r>-ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭ</r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ᱮᱭᱮᱭ</l>    <r>-ᱮᱭᱮᱭ</r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ᱤᱨᱟᱹᱞ</l>    <r>-ᱤᱨᱟᱹᱞ</r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ᱟᱨᱮ</l>     <r>-ᱟᱨᱮ</r></p><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
</pardef>


	

<pardef n="__ij">
      <e>     <p><l>ᱟᱦᱟ</l><r>ᱟᱦᱟ<s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ᱥᱟᱨᱦᱟᱣ</l><r>ᱥᱟᱨᱦᱟᱣ<s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>     <p><l>ᱥᱟᱨᱦᱟᱣ ᱜᱮ</l><r>ᱥᱟᱨᱦᱟᱣ ᱜᱮ<s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ᱦᱚᱭ</l><r>ᱦᱚᱭ<s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ᱦᱮᱸ</l><r>ᱦᱮᱸ<s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ᱮᱦᱮ</l><r>ᱮᱦᱮ<s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
      <e>     <p><l>ᱥᱟᱹᱨᱤ ᱜᱮ</l><r>ᱥᱟᱹᱨᱤ ᱜᱮ<s n="ij"/></r></p></e>     
</pardef>

		

    <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->  

    <!-- genitives (need a check)
    <pardef n="__gen_endings">
        <e><p><l>ᱭᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱭᱟᱜ<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ᱨᱤᱱ</l><r>ᱨᱤᱱ<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ᱠᱤᱱᱟᱜ</l><r>ᱠᱤᱱᱟᱜ<s n="post"/><s n="gen"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

 -->
<!-- SECTION: Paradigm Nouns -->

<pardef n="ᱵᱤᱥᱩ__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
 		
<pardef n="ᱥᱨᱤᱭᱟ__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱠᱤᱥᱠᱩ__np">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>











	<!-- Paradigms define ends here. 
    <pardef n="ᱰᱟᱹᱝᱜᱽᱨᱤ__n">       
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ᱠᱚ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="house__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s'</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
			
-->

<pardef n="ᱠᱚᱧᱮ__n">       
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱰᱟᱹᱝᱜᱽᱨᱤ__n">       
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l> ᱠᱚ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l> ᱠᱤᱱ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱚᱠᱛᱚ__n">       
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l> ᱠᱚ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l> ᱠᱤᱱ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ᱡᱟᱹᱱᱤᱡ</l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ᱚᱛᱚᱱᱚᱜ__n">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l> ᱠᱚ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l> ᱠᱤᱱ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ᱜ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ᱜ ᱠᱚ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ᱜ ᱠᱤᱱ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
	
<pardef n="ᱵᱷᱟᱨᱚᱛ__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nice/__adj">
  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="th/is__det">
  <e>       <p><l>ᱫᱚ</l>        <r>ᱫᱚ<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ᱠᱚ ᱫᱚ</l>       <r>ᱠᱚ ᱫᱚ<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="he__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="e.g.__abbr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!--  Verb  -->
<pardef n="ᱡᱚᱢ__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l> ᱠᱮᱜᱟᱹᱧ</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l> ᱮᱫᱟᱭ</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l> ᱮᱫ ᱛᱟᱦᱮᱸᱡ</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l> ᱮᱫᱟᱭ</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l> ᱟᱭ</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l> ᱞᱮᱫᱟᱭ</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!--  be Verb  -->

<e lm="ᱚᱛᱚᱞ"><i>ᱚᱛᱚᱞ</i><par n="ᱡᱚᱢ__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱛᱚᱲᱮᱡ"><i>ᱚᱛᱚᱲᱮᱡ</i><par n="ᱡᱚᱢ__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱛᱟ"><i>ᱚᱛᱟ</i><par n="ᱡᱚᱢ__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱛᱮ"><i>ᱚᱛᱮ</i><par n="ᱡᱚᱢ__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱛᱱᱚ"><i>ᱚᱛᱱᱚ</i><par n="ᱚᱛᱚᱱᱚᱜ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱠᱚᱴ"><i>ᱚᱠᱚᱴ</i><par n="ᱡᱚᱢ__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ᱚᱠᱛᱚ"><i>ᱚᱠᱛᱚ</i><par n="ᱚᱠᱛᱚ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱞᱰᱮᱢᱟᱨ"><i>ᱟᱞᱰᱮᱢᱟᱨ</i><par n="ᱵᱤᱥᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱨᱤᱥᱴᱚᱠᱞᱮᱥ"><i>ᱟᱨᱤᱥᱴᱚᱠᱞᱮᱥ</i><par n="ᱵᱤᱥᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱪᱷᱩᱪᱷᱚ"><i>ᱪᱷᱩᱪᱷᱚ</i><par n="ᱵᱤᱥᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱮᱞᱩᱱᱮᱭ"><i>ᱮᱞᱩᱱᱮᱭ</i><par n="ᱵᱤᱥᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱜᱚᱰᱮᱯᱷᱨᱮᱭ"><i>ᱜᱚᱰᱮᱯᱷᱨᱮᱭ</i><par n="ᱵᱤᱥᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱡᱚᱱ ᱒"><i>ᱡᱚᱱ<b/>᱒</i><par n="ᱵᱤᱥᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱩᱱᱭᱟ"><i>ᱥᱩᱱᱭᱟ</i><par n="ᱥᱨᱤᱭᱟ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱩᱨᱢᱩ"><i>ᱢᱩᱨᱢᱩ</i><par n="ᱠᱤᱥᱠᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱠᱤᱥᱠᱩ"><i>ᱠᱤᱥᱠᱩ</i><par n="ᱠᱤᱥᱠᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱦᱮᱸᱵᱽᱨᱚᱢ"><i>ᱦᱮᱸᱵᱽᱨᱚᱢ</i><par n="ᱠᱤᱥᱠᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱴᱩᱰᱩ"><i>ᱴᱩᱰᱩ</i><par n="ᱠᱤᱥᱠᱩ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱵᱷᱟᱨᱚᱛ"><i>ᱵᱷᱟᱨᱚᱛ</i><par n="ᱵᱷᱟᱨᱚᱛ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱤᱧᱚᱛ"><i>ᱥᱤᱧᱚᱛ</i><par n="ᱵᱷᱟᱨᱚᱛ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱱᱮᱯᱟᱞ"><i>ᱱᱮᱯᱟᱞ</i><par n="ᱵᱷᱟᱨᱚᱛ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱵᱟᱝᱞᱟᱫᱮᱥ"><i>ᱵᱟᱝᱞᱟᱫᱮᱥ</i><par n="ᱵᱷᱟᱨᱚᱛ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱪᱟᱸᱫᱚ"><i>ᱪᱟᱸᱫᱚ</i><par n="ᱰᱟᱹᱝᱜᱽᱨᱤ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱟ.ᱜᱩᱱ"><i>ᱥᱟ.ᱜᱩᱱ</i><par n="ᱰᱟᱹᱝᱜᱽᱨᱤ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱪᱟᱹᱛ"><i>ᱪᱟᱹᱛ</i><par n="ᱰᱟᱹᱝᱜᱽᱨᱤ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱟᱱ"><i>ᱥᱟᱱ</i><par n="ᱰᱟᱹᱝᱜᱽᱨᱤ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱯᱩᱸᱰ"><i>ᱯᱩᱸᱰ</i><par n="ᱰᱟᱹᱝᱜᱽᱨᱤ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱤᱨᱟᱹᱞᱜᱮᱞ-ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭ">      <i>ᱤᱨᱟᱹᱞᱜᱮᱞ-ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱚᱬᱮᱜᱮᱞ">           <i>ᱢᱚᱬᱮᱜᱮᱞ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨᱜᱮᱞ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱚᱬᱮᱜᱮᱞ-ᱟᱨᱮ">      <i>ᱢᱚᱬᱮᱜᱮᱞ-ᱟᱨᱮ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱯᱩᱱᱜᱮᱞ">           <i>ᱯᱩᱱᱜᱮᱞ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨᱜᱮᱞ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱜᱮᱞᱯᱩᱱ">        <i>ᱜᱮᱞᱯᱩᱱ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ">         <i>ᱢᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ</i><par n="ᱢᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱨᱮᱜᱮᱞ">          <i>ᱟᱨᱮᱜᱮᱞ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨᱜᱮᱞ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱨᱮᱜᱮᱞ-ᱢᱤᱫ">      <i>ᱟᱨᱮᱜᱮᱞ-ᱢᱤᱫ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱤᱫ">             <i>ᱢᱤᱫ</i><par n="ᱢᱤᱫ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱢᱤᱫ ᱵᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ">     <i>ᱢᱤᱫ<b/>ᱵᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ</i><par n="ᱢᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱮᱭᱮᱭᱜᱮᱞ">         <i>ᱮᱭᱮᱭᱜᱮᱞ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨᱜᱮᱞ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭ">             <i>ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭᱜᱮᱞ">           <i>ᱛᱩᱨᱩᱭᱜᱮᱞ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨᱜᱮᱞ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱯᱮᱜᱮᱞ">          <i>ᱯᱮᱜᱮᱞ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨᱜᱮᱞ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱵᱟᱨᱜᱮᱞ-ᱢᱚᱬᱮ">     <i>ᱵᱟᱨᱜᱮᱞ-ᱢᱚᱬᱮ</i><par n="ᱵᱟᱨ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱩᱱ">            <i>ᱥᱩᱱ</i><par n="ᱢᱤᱫ__num"/></e>
<e lm="III">             <i>III</i><par n="ᱢᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ__num"/></e>
<e lm="VI">              <i>VI</i><par n="ᱢᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ__num"/></e>
<e lm="XI">              <i>XI</i><par n="ᱢᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIX">             <i>XIX</i><par n="ᱢᱤᱞᱤᱭᱚᱱ__num"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱤᱰᱤ"><i>ᱥᱤᱰᱤ</i><par n="e.g.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ᱤᱮᱠᱥ."><i>ᱤᱮᱠᱥ.</i><par n="e.g.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ᱠᱮ"><i>ᱠᱮ</i><par n="e.g.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ᱮᱱᱮ"><i>ᱮᱱᱮ</i><par n="e.g.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ᱟᱨᱤᱮᱥᱯᱤ."><i>ᱟᱨᱤᱮᱥᱯᱤ.</i><par n="e.g.__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ᱰᱟᱹᱵᱞᱩ"><i>ᱰᱟᱹᱵᱞᱩ</i><par n="e.g.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="getxoko estropaden" a="eleka"><i>getxoko<b/>estropaden</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Eusko Trenbidea" a="eleka"><i>Eusko<b/>Trenbidea</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Erriko Kirolak Eguna" a="eleka"><i>Erriko<b/>Kirolak<b/>Eguna</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Youtube"><i>Youtube</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="SPICE" a="greenbreen"><i>SPICE</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Linkedin" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>Linkedin</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱞᱤᱞ"><i>ᱞᱤᱞ</i><par n="nice/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ᱡᱚᱢ"><i>ᱡᱚᱢ</i><par n="ᱡᱚᱢ__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ᱥᱟᱱᱛᱟᱲᱤ"><i>ᱥᱟᱱᱛᱟᱲᱤ</i><par n="ᱠᱚᱧᱮ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱦᱤᱱᱫᱤ"><i>ᱦᱤᱱᱫᱤ</i><par n="ᱠᱚᱧᱮ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱯᱩᱭᱥᱟᱹ"><i>ᱯᱩᱭᱥᱟᱹ</i><par n="ᱰᱟᱹᱝᱜᱽᱨᱤ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ᱣᱤᱠᱤᱯᱤᱰᱤᱭᱟ"><i>ᱣᱤᱠᱤᱯᱤᱰᱤᱭᱟ</i><par n="ᱵᱷᱟᱨᱚᱛ__np"/></e>
<e lm="ᱣᱤᱠᱤᱢᱤᱰᱤᱭᱟ"><i>ᱣᱤᱠᱤᱢᱤᱰᱤᱭᱟ</i><par n="ᱵᱷᱟᱨᱚᱛ__np"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="emails"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="urls"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ip"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>			 <par n="quotes"/></e>
